Hawaii statutes.
§503B-8 Bond. (a) Each commissioner
forthwith and before entering upon the duties of the commissioner's office
shall execute at the commissioner's own expense an official surety bond or
deposit with the lieutenant governor a cash bond, which in either case shall be
in the sum of $10,000. Each bond shall be approved by the office of the
lieutenant governor.

(b) The obligee of each bond shall be the
State and the condition contained therein shall be that the commissioner will
well, truly, and faithfully perform all the duties of the commissioner's office
that are then or may thereafter be required, prescribed, or defined by law or
by any rule made under the express or implied authority of any statute, and all
duties and acts undertaken, assumed, or performed by the commissioner by virtue
or color of the commissioner's office. The surety on any surety bond shall be
a surety company authorized to do business in the State. After approval, the
bond shall be deposited and kept on file in the office of the lieutenant
governor. The lieutenant governor shall keep a book to be called the
"bond record", in which the lieutenant governor shall record the data
in respect to each of the bonds deposited and filed in the lieutenant
governor's office.

(c) A commissioner who files a cash bond may
cancel the bond by giving thirty days notice in writing to the lieutenant
governor; provided that the security for the bond shall not be returned for a
period of six years after the effective date of cancellation of the bond or
upon posting a surety bond meeting the requirements set forth in this section,
whichever shall occur first. [L 2013, c 277, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 78, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next